Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2196.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 22ACONSUMER CHOICE BILLINGSec.22A01. Scope of chapter. 22A02. Declaration of policy.22A03. Definitions.22A04. Authorization of consumer choice billing.22A05. Implementation plans.22A06. Report.22A07. Penalties.1234567891011121314151617 § 22A01. Scope of chapter. This chapter provides for enhanced retail electric and natural gas competition through the adoption of electric and natural gas consumer choice billing and enhanced consumer protection regulations to be promulgated and enforced by the commission.§ 22A02. Declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Reasonably priced reliable sources of electricity and natural gas generated and supplied in this Commonwealth are vital to the health, safety and welfare of this Commonwealth's residents, businesses and economy.(2) Numerous states, including this Commonwealth, have transitioned to a restructured energy market that has lowered the cost of electricity and natural gas and spurred technological and product innovations by authorizing competitive retail electric and natural gas supplier shopping.(3) The former provisions of 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 74 (relating to generation choice for customers of electric cooperatives) and Chapters 22 (relating to natural gas competition) and 28 (relating to restructuring of electric utility industry) allow retail competition among electric and natural gas generation companies in order to lower consumer costs while maintaining regulation and supervision of electric and natural gas transmission and distribution services.(4) The year 2026 marked the 30th anniversary of the enactment of the former provisions of 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 74, the 27th anniversary of the enactment of the Natural Gas Choice and Competition Act and the 30th anniversary of the enactment 20260HB2196PN2887 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the Electricity Generation Customer Choice and Competition Act, yet a ccording to utility shopping statistics released in October 2025 by the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission , only 23% of residential electric consumers and 11.3% of residential natural gas consumers are served by an alternative service supplier, which is an indication that there is tremendous growth potential in this Commonwealth's residential electric and natural gas consumer market.(5) In markets where suppliers do not have access to smart meter data or the ability to render consolidated bills, consumers are restricted to one-size-fits-all rates that provide limited benefits.(6) These basic rates may meet the needs of some consumers, but consolidated billing enables the development of pricing plans and offers that meet the unique needs of all consumers, including time-varying rates, demand response and renewable energy plans.(7) While consumers in this Commonwealth have invested billions of dollars into the deployment of more than 5,000,000 smart meters across this Commonwealth, regulated electric and natural gas distribution utilities have not capitalized on this consumer usage data to offer cost-effective and affordable time-of-use products to consumers.(8) Maintaining the status quo of retail electric and natural gas policies is not sound public policy given the turbulence in residential electric and natural gas rates and the historic public and private financial investments in this Commonwealth's ever-changing energy marketplace.(9) By allowing a direct relationship between retail electric and natural gas suppliers and consumers who choose 20260HB2196PN2887 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to shop, consumer choice billing will enable suppliers to clarify their role with consumers, who may believe that they are only consumers of the utility regardless of their retail supplier, and solidify that role by providing the products and services the consumers desire.(10) The commission's mission is to balance the needs of consumers and utilities, ensure safe and reliable utility service, educate consumers on making independent and informed utility choices and foster new technologies and competitive markets in an environmentally sound manner.(11) To achieve a fully functioning competitive electric and natural gas market in this Commonwealth, the commission has the legal and regulatory authority to promote and further incentivize the development of dynamic electric and natural gas supplier product offerings to consumers and improve utility consumer service through the adoption and regulation of consumer choice billing.§ 22A03. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An entity pursuing a new or amended electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier license issued by the commission."Consumer." A residential, commercial or industrial retail electric or natural gas customer."Consumer choice billing." The consolidated billing of retail electric and natural gas services, as provided by an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier for all electric or natural gas charges, including electric or natural 20260HB2196PN2887 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 gas distribution and transmission charges."Electric distribution company." As defined in section 2803 (relating to definitions)."Electric generation supplier." As defined in section 2803."Natural gas distribution company." As defined in section 2202 (relating to definitions)."Natural gas supplier." As defined in section 2202.§ 22A04. Authorization of consumer choice billing.(a) Duty.--T he commission shall promulgate temporary regulations to authorize consumer choice billing, including all of the following:(1) Providing adequate consumer billing protections for consumers who select an alternative electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier and elect to be billed by the alternative electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier.(2) Increasing competition in this Commonwealth's electric generation supplier and natural gas supplier marketplaces and fostering the development of direct and transparent relationships between suppliers and their consumers.(b) Implementation.--For the purpose of implementing this section, the temporary regulations promulgated by the commission under subsection (a) shall include all of the following:(1) An additional application requirement for the new licensure of an electric generation suppler or natural gas supplier, or the amendment of an existing electric generation suppler or natural gas supplier license to provide for consumer choice billing if the applicant maintains a current and valid license issued by the commission and submits a 20260HB2196PN2887 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 statement confirming that the applicant will not offer or provide consumer choice billing absent the commission's authorization for the provisioning of consumer choice billing. Nothing in this act may be construed to require an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier to apply to or participate in consumer choice billing.(2) A requirement that an applicant seeking to provide consumer choice billing meets the following technical and financial qualifications:(i) Maintains bonding or financial guarantees with the commission for sales of electricity in the amount of $250,000. The security under this subparagraph shall be in addition to the security required under 52 Pa. Code § 54.40 (relating to bonds or other security).(ii) Maintains bonding or financial guarantees with each n atural gas distribution company in the service territory where the applicant provides service. The security under this subparagraph shall be in addition to the security required under 52 Pa. Code § 62.11 1 (relating to bonds or other security).(iii) Maintains bonding or financial guarantees with each utility where the applicant plans to offer consumer choice billing in an amount equal to the sum of the two highest months of utility receivables in the previous 12 months in addition to the security required under 52 Pa. Code § § 54.40 and 62.11 1. (iv) Certifies that the applicant has not had its license revoked in this Commonwealth in the previous five years.(v) Certifies that the applicant will comply with 20260HB2196PN2887 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission regulations for bills that contain regulated e lectric distribution company or n atural gas distribution company charges and retail energy charges. (vi) Demonstrates that the applicant can meet the rigorous demands of increased consumer service and dispute resolution functions, including the operation of call centers, support of complex billing requirements, responsible execution of collections functions and the quality assurance and recordkeeping necessary to handle e lectric distribution company or n atural gas distribution company charges that contribute to potential electric or natural gas service disconnections.(vii) Attests to the applicant's ability to comply with applicable regulations related to payment plans or to assist customers with other payment assistance options by employing new or existing consumer assistance programs prior to the initiation of the termination.(viii) Agrees to purchase the receivables for regulated charges of an e lectric distribution company or n atural gas distribution company. (ix) Agrees to timely inform the commission of any material change or the cancellation of the bonding or collateral required under this paragraph.( x) Agrees to comply with all of the following : (A) 52 Pa. Code § 54.43(f) (relating to standards of conduct and disclosure for licensees) for an electric generation supplier.(B) 52 Pa. Code § 62.114(e) (relating to standards of conduct and disclosure for licensees) for a natural gas supplier.20260HB2196PN2887 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) 52 Pa. Code Ch. 111 (relating to marketing and sales practices for the retail residential energy market).(3) A process for an applicant to petition the commission for authorization to provide consumer choice billing through a third party if the applicant does not have five years of experience or if the applicant otherwise meets the qualifications under paragraph (2).(4) A process for an electric distribution company or a natural gas distribution company to petition the commission to recover any stranded costs related to prudent investments in billing infrastructure prior to the implementation of consumer choice billing, subject to a commission-imposed prudency review.(5) A requirement that an e lectric distribution company or n atural gas distribution company timely furnish an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier participating in consumer choice billing with the necessary billing data.(6) A standardized form of consumer notice to be used when an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier ceases providing a particular type of service.(7) A consumer choice billing working group for stakeholders to draft tariff provisions, collect data, design business processes, configure electronic transactions, review similar programs in other states, define a comprehensive consumer choice billing education program to support consumer choice billing launches and consider any other relevant matters, including the process for disconnection or termination of utility service outside of the scope of this 20260HB2196PN2887 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter.(8) An electronic data exchange working group to develop proposed electronic transactions for an electric distribution company, natural gas distribution company, electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier to exchange necessary consumption, billing, payment and related data.(9) A prohibition on an electric distribution company or natural gas distribution company from requiring an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier to purchase a consumer's arrears from the electric distribution company, natural gas distribution company or another entity.(10) A prohibition on an electric distribution company or natural gas distribution company from utilizing consumer information to:(i) market standard offer service;(ii) research or market other electric distribution company or natural gas distribution company services; or(iii) share information the electric distribution company or natural gas distribution company acquires through electronic transactions that facilitate consumer choice billing with the unregulated affiliates of the electric distribution company or natural gas distribution company or any other nongovernmental entity.(11) The circumstances, terms and conditions for an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier to change a consumer's billing method to or from consumer choice billing and the corresponding content and timing of consumer notification.(12) The terms and conditions for a consumer on budget billing with an electric distribution company or natural gas 20260HB2196PN2887 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distribution company at the time of the switch.(13) The terms and conditions for the purchase of receivables, including prioritization of partial payments and dispute resolution processes.(14) The terms and conditions for nonpayment by a consumer receiving consumer choice billing, including the content of collection notices, purchase of arrears and limitations and unpaid charges.(15) The terms and conditions for the participation of consumers receiving energy assistance through a utility's customer assistance program in consumer choice billing.(16) An accounting of all electric or natural gas distribution company costs, including commodity costs, capacity costs, hedging costs whether financial or physical, procurement costs, billing system and billing costs, customer service and account management costs, working capital, office building, rent and information technology costs, legal and financial costs and labor costs.(17) A prohibition on third-party use of electric or natural gas distribution company trademarks for noncommodity marketing and their inclusion on consumer utility bills.(c) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this chapter, regulations promulgated under subsection (a) shall be deemed temporary regulations that shall expire no later than two years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The temporary regulations shall not be subject to:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 20260HB2196PN2887 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) The commission's authority to promulgate temporary regulations shall expire upon the promulgation of final-form regulations or two years after the effective date of this paragraph, whichever is later.§ 22A05. Implementation plans.(a) Submission.--No later than 45 days after the effective date of this subsection, the commission shall issue an order requiring an electric distribution company or natural gas distribution company to submit an implementation plan to the commission within 180 days. The implementation plan shall:(1) demonstrate how the electric distribution company or natural gas distribution company will meet the requirements under this chapter;(2) be subject to commission approval on an expedited basis, if necessary; and(3) include all tariffs, agreements, processes, proposed cost recovery mechanisms and other components required for approval by the commission in accordance with the commission's order under this subsection.(b) Records of recoverable costs.--An electric distribution company or natural gas distribution company shall maintain a 20260HB2196PN2887 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 record of recoverable costs as regulatory assets, which shall be recovered in the immediately subsequent rate case and adjusted in future base rate cases in accordance with section 1308 (relating to voluntary changes in rates) or through an alternative rate mechanism under section 1330 (relating to alternative ratemaking for utilities).§ 22A06. Report. (a) Submission.--No later than 365 days after the promulgation of final-form regulations implementing consumer choice billing, the commission shall submit a report to the chair and minority chair of the Consumer Protection and Professional Licensure Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the Consumer Protection, Technology and Utilities Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Details.--The report under subsection (a) shall detail the status of consumer choice billing, including all of the following information about consumers who elected to participate in consumer choice billing:(1) Retail electric and natural gas shopping statistics.(2) Consumer complaints.(3) Billing disputes.(4) Service terminations.(5) Any other information to determine whether modifications are necessary to consumer choice billing qualifications and regulations for the purpose of enhancing retail electric and natural gas service shopping.§ 22A07. Penalties. (a) Violations by suppliers.--For a violation of this chapter, including a violation of the commission's orders or regulations, by an electric generation supplier or natural gas 20260HB2196PN2887 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supplier, c onsistent with the requirements of due process, the commission may impose any of the following: (1) A suspension or revocation of the electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier's participation in consumer choice billing.(2) A suspension or revocation of the license of an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier for a violation of this chapter.(3) For a fraudulent, deceptive or other unlawful marketing act, a fine on the electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier in accordance with Chapter 33 (relating to violations and penalties).(b) Violations by agents.--In accordance with 52 Pa. Code § 54.43(f) (relating to standards of conduct and disclosure for licensees) for an electric generation supplier and 52 Pa. Code § 62.114(e) (relating to standards of conduct and disclosure for licensees) for a natural gas supplier, an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier shall be responsible for fraudulent, deceptive or other unlawful marketing acts performed by an agent of the electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier . For a violation of this chapter, including a violation of the commission's orders or regulations, by an agent of an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier, consistent with due process, the commission may impose any of the following : (1) A suspension or revocation of the electric generation supplier's or natural gas supplier's participation in consumer choice billing.(2) A suspension or revocation of the license of an electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier for a 20260HB2196PN2887 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violation of this chapter.(3) For a fraudulent, deceptive or other unlawful marketing act, a fine on the electric generation supplier or natural gas supplier in accordance with Chapter 33.Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraph (2) are necessary to effectuate the addition of 66 Pa.C.S. Ch. 22A.(2) The provisions of 66 Pa.C.S. §§ 2205(c) and 2807(c) are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of 66 Pa.C.S. Ch. 22A.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20260HB2196PN2887 - 14 - 123456789101112